District of Columbia statutes.
22-702

Repealed

Offering or receiving money, property, or valuable consideration to procure office or promotion from Council

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(b)-(d), 29 DCR 3976
1981 Ed., §§ 22-701 to 22-703.